Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-917
Sewers; resolution to construct, purchase, or acquire; vote required.

Upon compliance with sections 17-913 to 17-916, the council or board of trustees may by resolution order the making, reconstruction, purchase or otherwise acquiring of any of the improvements provided for in section 17-913. The vote upon any such resolution shall be as required by section 17-616.

Laws 1919, c. 189, § 5, p. 429;

C.S.1922, § 4341;

C.S.1929, § 17-532;

R.S.1943, § 17-917;

Laws 1947, c. 39, § 2, p. 152.